Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 17

Management Of State Institutions

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. Purchases for state institutions, §19-11-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1889, No. 17, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 434, §§ 8, 9: Apr. 1, 1911. Emergency declared.

Acts 1977, No. 954, § 8: Mar. 29, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the public interest of this State to utilize fully its human resources; that it is essential to the proper utilization of said resources that an official body be created to study and determine the best procedure to be followed in order that said human resources of this State may be fully utilized without regard to race, sex, religion, age or economic condition; and, that this Act will create such body and should take effect immediately in order that said body can proceed to effectuate public policy of this State as stated in this Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

25-17-101. Antidiscrimination clause required in contracts.

All agencies of the state or any department thereof shall include in all contracts negotiated or renegotiated by them for and on the behalf of the state a provision obligating the contractor not to discriminate against any qualified employee or qualified applicant for employment because of race, color, creed, national origin, or ancestry and shall require the contractor to include a similar provision in all subcontracts.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 954, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1506; Acts 1991, No. 343, § 9.

25-17-102. Allowance of claims against state charitable and educational institutions.

It shall be unlawful for any board of trustees created under the laws of this state, when the duties of the board are to manage any of the charitable and educational institutions supported wholly or in part by this state, to allow any greater sum for any account, claim, or demand against the state than the amount actually due in lawful money of the United States, according to the legal, ordinary, and customary compensation for services rendered, materials furnished, and salaries or fees of officers, trustees, attendants, or servants.

Before any account, claim, or demand whatever shall be allowed by any board of trustees, that board shall require a person or his or her legal representative who claims it to be due to attach to the account, claim, or demand an affidavit at the expense of the claimant, that:

The account, claim, or demand is just and correct and no part thereof has been previously paid;

The services charged for or materials furnished, as the case may be, were actually rendered or furnished and the charge made does not exceed the amount allowed by law or the customary charges for similar services or materials;

The account, claim, or demand is not enlarged, enhanced, or otherwise made greater in consequence or by reason of any estimated wrongs, whether supposed or real, arising by reason of any previous contract.

The allowed claim or demand with affidavit attached thereto shall be filed with the Auditor of State and kept in his or her office, subject to inspection by any member of the grand jury of the county or prosecuting attorney of the circuit court.

The General Assembly shall provide a joint committee every two (2) years, whose duty it shall be to examine the accounts thoroughly, together with all allowances made on account of the claims and report them to each branch of the General Assembly.

In all cases, the board of trustees shall require an itemized account of any claim presented to them for allowance, sworn to as required in subsection (b) of this section, and may in all cases require satisfactory evidence, in addition thereto, of the correctness of the account.

The board of trustees may examine the parties and witnesses on oath touching the correctness of the account and shall have the power to compel the production of all books, accounts, papers, and documents which may be necessary in the investigation of any matter coming properly before them and within their jurisdiction.

The board of trustees is prohibited from auditing, approving, or allowing any claim not specifically allowed the claimant by law or contracted for by the board in strict pursuance of the statutes.

The Auditor of State is prohibited from drawing his or her warrant on the Treasurer of State in payment of any claim or demand against the charitable or educational institutions unless the claim or demand shall be itemized and verified as required by subsection (b) of this section, approved and ordered paid by a majority of the board of trustees, and filed in the office of the Auditor of State.

No claim or demand shall be paid unless there is an unexpended appropriation previously made to pay it.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 17, §§ 1-4, p. 15; 1893, No. 162, § 1, p. 291; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9324-9327; Pope's Dig., §§ 12512-12515; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-101 — 7-104.

25-17-103. Repair of damage to charitable institution.

In case of destruction of any of the charitable institutions by fire or tornado, the board of trustees is authorized and empowered upon the approval of the Governor to borrow money at a reasonable rate of interest and immediately repair the damage done to the building.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 434, § 6.

Subchapter 2

— Honorary Boards and Commissions

Publisher's Notes. Those provisions of Acts 1943, No. 1, which established honorary boards and commissions governing various state institutions, are codified in full in this subchapter and are codified with respect to particular institutions in §§6-43-101,6-43-102,6-65-103,6-65-201,6-65-202,6-65-301,6-65-302,6-66-101,6-66-102,6-67-102,6-67-103.

Effective Dates. Acts 1927, No. 37, § 19: June 30, 1927.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 9: Jan. 14, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that amendment No. 33 to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, which will become effective on January 15, 1943, provides that the General Assembly shall arrange the terms of office of the members of boards charged with the management or control of all charitable, penal, or correctional institutions and institutions of higher learning of the State of Arkansas in such manner that the term of office of one member of said board shall expire each year and that said amendment further provides that the unexpired terms of members serving on the effective date of the amendment shall not be decreased; and, it is further found and declared that the terms of members of all of said boards do not expire in a manner which will make operative all of the provisions of said amendment. It is found, therefore, that delay in the effective date of this act will create confusion by reason of the uncertain status of present board members, and, that in order to preserve the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1953, No. 140, § 2: Feb. 24, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It is found by the General Assembly that the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint the members of the Board of Trustees of the State Agricultural, Mechanical, and Normal College and that due to the congressional redistricting, confusion exists as to the appointment of such members; that such confusion adversely affects the public peace, health, and safety and further that the provisions of this act are necessary to alleviate such conditions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 497, § 3: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is necessary to provide that one member of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf be a deaf person fluent in sign language; that such is not now required, and that this is immediately necessary to provide such requirement. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1192, § 7: Apr. 11, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is important to the education and welfare of the students at the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf that they receive instruction from caring and qualified individuals; that there is currently a demand for persons qualified in deaf and blind instruction; that persons who are qualified to give instruction in blind and deaf education oftentimes are related to other persons also qualified to give that instruction; that enabling such persons to work together to provide quality education benefits the students at the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf; that in order to ensure that such qualified persons are not precluded from providing much needed services to the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas School for the Deaf it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 219, § 5: Feb. 20, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that attendance at board and commission meetings is essential to provide necessary governmental services; that a quorum of board and commission members is necessary to transact essential business and to legally provide and monitor essential governmental services; that the provisions of this act will provide to ensure attendance at board and commission meetings; and that delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

25-17-201. Boards created for management of various institutions.

The following honorary boards are created:

A board of five (5) members constituting the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf;

A board of five (5) members constituting the Board of Corrections;

A board of seven (7) members constituting the Board of Trustees of the University of Central Arkansas, hereby made and constituted a body politic and corporate;

A board of seven (7) members constituting the Board of Trustees of Henderson State University, hereby made and constituted a body politic and corporate;

A board of five (5) members to be appointed from the state at large, constituting the Board of Trustees of Arkansas State University; and

A board of (5) five members to be appointed from counties in the Second Agricultural and Mechanical District, constituting the Board of Trustees of Arkansas Tech University.

[Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1943, No. 1, § 2, as amended, also created the following honorary boards which were subsequently abolished or superseded: State Hospital Board; Board of Trustees of Arkansas Tuberculosis Sanatorium (abolished by Acts 1973, No. 320, § 4); Board of Trustees of McRae Memorial Sanatorium (sanatorium abolished by Acts 1967, No. 116); Confederate Home Board (repealed by Acts 1963, No. 161, § 4); Boards of Managers for Boys Industrial Schools and Training Schools for Girls (abolished by Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 20); Board of Trustees of Magnolia Agricultural and Mechanical College (superseded by §6-65-401 et seq.); Board of Trustees of Arkansas Agricultural and Mechanical College (abolished by Acts 1971, No. 9); Board of Trustees of Junior Agricultural College (abolished by Acts 1955, No. 84); Board of Trustees of State Agricultural, Mechanical, and Normal College (abolished by Acts 1971, No. 512).

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 1, abolished the following boards and commissions as they existed prior to enactment of the 1943 act: State Hospital; Arkansas Tuberculosis Sanatorium; Thomas C. McRae Sanatorium; Confederate Home; Arkansas School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf; State Penitentiary; Boys Industrial Schools; Training School for Girls; Arkansas State Teachers College; Henderson State Teachers College; Arkansas State College; Arkansas Polytechnic College; Agricultural and Mechanical College, 3rd District; Arkansas Agricultural and Mechanical College; Junior Agricultural College; and State Agricultural, Mechanical and Normal School.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment repealed (7).

Cited: Jackson v. Bishop, 404 F.2d 571 (8th Cir. 1968); Walther v. McDonald, 243 Ark. 912, 422 S.W.2d 854 (1968).

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 2; 1953, No. 140, § 1; 1963, No. 161, § 4; 1971, No. 9, § 5; 1971, No. 512, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-201; Acts 1997, No. 948, § 4; 2015, No. 344, § 12.

25-17-202. Powers and duties.

The boards created in §25-17-201 are charged with the management and control of the respective institutions of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-202.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1943, No. 1, § 3, provided, in part, that the honorary boards created in §6-67-102 would have the power, authority, and duties formerly exercised by the boards they succeeded and that those boards which were constituted as corporations were charged with the liabilities of the corporate bodies which they succeeded.

25-17-203. Eligibility for membership.

Members of the boards appointed by the Governor under the provisions of § 25-17-201, in addition to possessing the qualifications of an elector, shall reside in the State of Arkansas.

The Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Auditor of State, Treasurer of State, Commissioner of State Lands, Justices of the Supreme Court, and the directing head of any state department, state agency, or state institution shall be ineligible for membership on any of the boards provided for in § 25-17-201 during the time for which they were elected or appointed.

No individual may be a member of more than one (1) of the boards created under the provisions of § 25-17-201 at the same time.

Any vacancies arising in the membership of the boards for any reason other than the expiration of the regular terms for which the members were appointed shall be filled by the appointment of the Governor, subject to the approval by a majority of the remaining members of the respective boards and shall be thereafter effective until the expiration of the regular terms.

The Secretary of State shall furnish a certificate to each board member within ten (10) days following appointment, whereupon the appointee shall notify the Governor and the Secretary of State in writing of his or her acceptance of the appointment within thirty (30) days. If the appointee shall fail to give notice of his or her acceptance within the time required, then the appointment shall be declared void and another appointment shall be made.

Publisher's Notes. Pursuant to Ark. Const. Amend. 33, members of five-member boards serve terms of five years, members of seven-member boards serve terms of seven years, and members of ten-member boards serve terms of ten years.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “a regular session or fiscal session” for “regular session” in (c)(1).

Cross References. Filling vacancies in boards, Ark. Const. Amend. 33, § 5.

Governor's appointments to boards and commissions need Senate confirmation, §10-2-113.

This section does not apply to the Public Service Commission. Walther v. McDonald, 243 Ark. 912, 422 S.W.2d 854 (1968).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1979, No. 497, § 1, is also codified as §6-43-101.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning appointment of an advisory member of the Board of Correction, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 549, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 918, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-203.2; Acts 1987, No. 972, § 1.

Support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Arkansas;

Faithfully perform the duties of the office upon which he or she is about to enter; and

Not be or become directly or indirectly interested in any contract made by the board.

Ark. L. Rev.

Watkins, Open Meetings Under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 38 Ark. L. Rev. 268 (1984).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reimbursement for expenses, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 250, § 241. The section was derived from Acts 1943, No. 1, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-206. For present law, see §25-16-901 et seq.

Cross References. Removal of board members, Ark. Const. Amend. 33, § 4.

The secretary's notice to the Governor shall include a copy of all meeting notices and attendance records for the past year;

Any board or commission secretary's failing to submit the notices and documentation required by this section shall be considered cause for removal by the Governor in accordance with the procedures set forth at §25-17-210;

(A)Within sixty (60) days after receiving the notice and supporting documentation from the board or commission secretary, the Governor shall notify the board or commission member in writing of his or her intent to remove the member for cause.

This notice shall suffice for the notice required in § 25-17-210(a);

Within twenty (20) days of the date of the Governor's notice, the member may request an excused absence as provided by this section or may file notice with the Governor's office that the member disputes the attendance records and the reasons thereby;

The Governor shall grant an excuse for illness of the member when the illness is verified by a written sworn statement by the attending physician or other proper excuse as determined by the Governor; and

After twenty (20) days of the date of the Governor's notice, if no rebuttal is received or other adequate documentation submitted, the member may be removed in accordance with the provisions set forth at § 25-17-210.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the appointment and powers of superintendents, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 612, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1927, No. 37, §§ 12-14; Pope's Dig., §§ 12798-12800; Acts 1963, No. 514, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-208 — 7-210; Acts 1995, No. 1192, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 328, § 12: Mar. 13, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas has a substantial investment in its institutions and the lands and improvements devoted to their functions; that doubts exist concerning the right to police and regulate certain activities which should be regulated for the protection of these state institutions; that urgent reasons exist for providing for the adequate police authority which this enactment will achieve; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may these objectives be achieved. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety and for the protection of the public property, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 325, § 4: Mar. 17, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the maintenance of peace and order and the protection of public property and safety of persons and their property, who utilize the facilities of state parks is essential to the efficient and orderly use of said parks by the public, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to authorize the Department of Parks and Tourism to designate security officers to have the same powers to maintain law and order, and to protect the public peace in state parks as is now authorized for state supported institutions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2005, No. 2162, § 2: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a question concerning rental fees and charges of public institutions of higher education for the management and control of the property of such institutions with respect to the parking of motor vehicles thereon; and that it is necessary to clarify by this act that any such fees or charges are paid as rental for parking spaces designated either generally or specifically for a permitee and not as consideration for any service provided to the permit holder or person paying such fees and charges as rent. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-204; Acts 1991, No. 795, § 2.

25-17-204. Appointment and terms of members generally.

By and with the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint the members of the boards.

The term of office for each member shall commence January 15 and shall end on January 14 of the fifth or seventh year, as the number of years the full term may be, following the year in which the term commenced. The terms shall be arranged so that the term of one (1) member of each board shall expire each year.

(1)Within twenty (20) days after the convening of the General Assembly in a regular session or a fiscal session, the Governor shall submit to the Senate for confirmation the names of those board members and appointees who are by law required to be confirmed by the Senate.

However, the names of appointees to fill vacancies which occur after the first twenty (20) days of the session of the General Assembly, but prior to the adjournment thereof, shall be submitted within five (5) days from the date of each vacancy.

In the event of rejection by the Senate of an appointee whose name has been so submitted, the Governor shall submit the name of another appointee to fill the vacancy within ten (10) days after receipt of written notice from the Secretary of the Senate of the rejection.

In the event the Governor within the time herein required should fail to appoint or fail to submit to the Senate for confirmation the name of any appointee, then the office shall be vacant, and the Senate shall proceed to fill the vacancy by an appointee of its own choice.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, §§ 4, 6; 1947, No. 417, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-601, 7-203, 7-205; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 49.

25-17-205. Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf — Deaf and blind members — Parents or guardians as members.

There shall be at all times one (1) member of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf who is a deaf person who fluently utilizes deaf sign language.

The second vacancy arising on the board shall be filled by the appointment of a person who is legally blind.

(1)The Governor shall appoint one (1) person who is the parent of a blind student and one (1) person who is the parent of a deaf student to serve as advisory nonvoting members of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf.

The term of office of the advisory members shall be the same as the term of office of the other members of the board. Any vacancy arising in an advisory position shall be filled in the same manner as those of other vacancies arising in the membership of the board.

A state employee who is a parent or a legal guardian of a student at the Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas School for the Deaf shall be eligible to serve as a regular or advisory member of the board.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 497, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-203.1; Acts 1991, No. 795, § 1; 1993, No. 450, § 1.

25-17-206. [Repealed.]

Before entering upon his or her respective duties, each board member shall take, subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State an oath that he or she will:

(1)Any violation of the oath shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

Any contract entered into in violation of the oath shall be void.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-205; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 365.

25-17-208. Meetings generally.

(1)Unless otherwise provided by law, each honorary board or commission shall meet in regular session at least once each semiannual period and shall meet in special session as often as its business may require.

As used in this section, the term “honorary board or commission” means any state board or commission whose members receive no compensation other than stipends or reimbursement of expenses.

(1)All meetings shall be open to the public except when the board or commission has under consideration the employment, discharge, or investigation of an individual.

The board or commission by a majority vote thereof may declare the matter they are about to consider to be privileged and may declare a closed session for the period of time during which this matter is being discussed.

At the end of that time and before any new subject is discussed, the secretary of the board or commission shall announce to the public and press who may be in attendance that the meeting is reopened for the discussion of further business.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 417, § 2; 1949, No. 75, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-602; Acts 1991, No. 248, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 240.

25-17-209. [Repealed.]

25-17-210. Removal of members generally.

The Governor shall have the power to remove any member of an honorary board before the expiration of his or her term for cause only, after notice and hearing.

The removal shall become effective only when approved in writing by a majority of the total number of the board, but the member removed or his or her successor shall have no right to vote on the question of removal.

The documentation of removal action shall be filed with the Secretary of State together with a complete record of the proceedings at the hearing.

(1)An appeal may be taken to the Pulaski County Circuit Court by the Governor or the member ordered removed, and the appeal shall be tried de novo on the record of the hearing before the Governor.

An appeal may be taken from the circuit court to the Supreme Court, where the appeal shall likewise be tried de novo.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 1, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-205.

25-17-211. Absence of member from meetings as grounds for removal.

Attendance Required. In order to ensure broad representation and a quorum, all board or commission members have a responsibility to attend all regular or special meetings of the board or commission.

Excessive Absences. A board or commission member shall be subject to removal from the board or commission in the event the member shall fail to present to the Governor a satisfactory excuse for his or her absence. Unexcused absences from three (3) successive regular meetings, without attending any intermediary called special meetings, shall constitute sufficient cause for removal.

Notice and Removal Procedures. Removal of board or commission members shall be in accordance with the following:

(A)Within thirty (30) days after each regular board or commission meeting, the secretary of each board or commission shall notify the Governor in writing of any member who has been absent from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings.

Reimbursements Withheld. Any board or commission member referred to the Governor because of excessive absences under the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to any per diem or expense reimbursement for travel or attendance of any subsequent meeting until the board or commission receives notification from the Governor that the member has been excused for the absences.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 417, § 3; 1949, No. 75, § 2; 1961, No. 66, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-603; Acts 1997, No. 219, § 1.

25-17-212. [Repealed.]

25-17-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Executive head”, when used with reference to the University of Arkansas, means the President of the University of Arkansas System;

“Institution” means the educational, charitable, correctional, penal, and other institutions owned and operated by the State of Arkansas and shall include the respective state parks of this state;

“Property” means both real and personal property owned by or under the control of the institution and shall include all highways, streets, alleys, and rights-of-way that are contiguous or adjacent to property owned or controlled by the institution; and

“Property under the control of” shall include that property upon which any registered institutional organization is maintained or property rented or leased for the purpose of facilitating events or functions of the institution.

Where campus patrolman had witnessed traffic offenses and could form a reasonable belief that the defendant was intoxicated, such firsthand information and fact that he began pursuit within his jurisdiction, demonstrated that the patrolman was well within the bounds of his authority when he pursued the defendant for four blocks in the course of fresh pursuit and made the arrest outside the patrolman's jurisdiction. Smith v. City of Little Rock, 305 Ark. 168, 806 S.W.2d 371 (1991).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, § 1; 1971, No. 325, § 1; 1981, No. 805, §§ 1, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-112, 7-112.1; Acts 2007, No. 498, § 1.